Washington statutes.
RCW 39.106.070

Tax exemptions and preferences.

(1) As a municipal corporation, the property of an authority is exempt from taxation.

(2) An authority is entitled to all of the exemptions from or preferences with respect to taxes that are available to any or all of its members, other than a tribal member, in connection with the provision or management of utility services.

[ 2011 c 258 s 7.]